Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
195D

CONSERVATION
OF AQUATIC LIFE, WILDLIFE, AND

LAND
PLANTS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

195D-1 Findings and declaration of necessity

195D-2 Definitions

195D-3 Determination by the department relating
to

conservation of particular species

195D-4 Endangered species and threatened species

195D-4.5 Taking a monk seal prohibited

195D-5 Conservation programs

195D-5.1 Protection of Hawaii's unique flora and
fauna

195D-5.5 Products to support the environment

195D-6 Rules

195D-6.5 Interim rulemaking

195D-7 Enforcement

195D-8 Search and seizure

195D-9 Penalty

195D-10 Severability

Part II. Recovery

195D-21 Habitat conservation plans

195D-22 Safe harbor agreements

195D-23 Incentives

195D-24 Confidentiality

195D-25 Endangered species recovery committee

195D-26 Annual report; endangered species

195D-27 Repealed

195D-28 Relation of chapter to other laws

195D-29 Release or establishment of endangered or

threatened species outside its current
range

195D-30 Net gain in recovery of species

195D-31 Trust fund

195D-32 Citizen suits

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1983, c 111, §1.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Attorney General Opinions

Threatened and endangered plants are protected on Hawaiian
home lands under the provisions of this chapter, as well as under the
provisions of the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, to the same extent
that the plants are protected elsewhere in Hawaii. Anyone who
"takes" threatened or endangered plants on Hawaiian home lands is
subject to state and federal civil and criminal penalties. Att. Gen. Op. 95-5.

Case Notes

Chapter does not provide basis for private right of action to
stop building of highway. 538 F. Supp. 149.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next